Utah statutes.
72-9-106.   Exemption for public utilities from regulations establishing hours of service.

(1)  As used in this section, "emergency" means a condition which jeopardizes life or property or that endangers public health and safety.

(2)  A person who is an employee of an electrical corporation, a gas corporation, or a telephone corporation, as these corporations are defined in Section 54-2-1, is exempt from any hours of service rules and regulations for drivers while operating a public utility vehicle within the state during the emergency restoration of public utility service.

